Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 2. Interference with Commercial Fishing Gear.

Sec. 16.10.055.
Interference with commercial fishing gear.

A person who wilfully or with reckless disregard of the consequences, interferes with or damages the commercial fishing gear of another person is guilty of a misdemeanor. For the purposes of this section “interference” means the physical disturbance of gear which results in economic loss or loss of fishing time, and “reckless disregard of the consequences” means a lack of consideration for the consequences of one’s acts in a manner that is reasonably likely to damage the property of another.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 1974)

Cross references. —

For punishment of misdemeanors, see
AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and
AS

12.55.035

for fines.